apertium-cy-en.cy.dix.xml
    <pardef n="ateg/yn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yn</l>
          <r>yn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ion</l>
          <r>yn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bot/wm__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wm</l>
          <r>wm<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ymau</l>
          <r>wm<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="adw/aith__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aith</l>
          <r>aith<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eithiau</l>
          <r>aith<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="achwyn/ydd__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydd</l>
          <r>ydd<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wyr</l>
          <r>ydd<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aden__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydd</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="adolygiad/au__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>au</l>
          <r>au<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>au<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="awyrgylch__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="allwedd/air__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>air</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriau</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="academ/i__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ïau</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cyfans/wm__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wm</l>
          <r>wm<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ymiau</l>
          <r>wm<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cetris/en__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/wrdd__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wrdd</l>
          <r>wrdd<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yrddau</l>
          <r>wrdd<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ar/aith__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aith</l>
          <r>aith<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eithiau</l>
          <r>aith<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="blew/yn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yn</l>
          <r>yn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>yn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="blynedd__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ambiwlans__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="baban__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>od</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="beirnia/d__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cydran/nydd__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nydd</l>
          <r>nydd<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yddion</l>
          <r>nydd<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="deond/y__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ban__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nau</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="canllaw__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iau</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="arwydd__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ion</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="anaf__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iadau</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dr/ws__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ws</l>
          <r>ws<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ysau</l>
          <r>ws<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="arol/wg__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wg</l>
          <r>wg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ygon</l>
          <r>wg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ats/ain__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ain</l>
          <r>ain<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>einiau</l>
          <r>ain<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cyflog/ai__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>ai<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eion</l>
          <r>ai<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="annibyn/nwr__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nwr</l>
          <r>nwr<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wyr</l>
          <r>nwr<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="blynedd"><par n="initial-b"/><i>lynedd</i><par n="blynedd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="clod"><par n="initial-c"/><i>lod</i><par n="awyrgylch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gramadeg"><par n="initial-g"/><i>ramadeg</i><par n="awyrgylch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="colled"><par n="initial-c"/><i>olled</i><par n="arwydd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ergyd"><i>ergyd</i><par n="arwydd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cyffur"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yffur</i><par n="canllaw__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rhyw"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>yw</i><par n="canllaw__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cylchfan"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ylchfan</i><par n="ban__n"/></e>
    <e lm="man"><par n="initial-m"/><i>an</i><par n="ban__n"/></e>
    <e lm="difyrwaith"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ifyrw</i><par n="adw/aith__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mecanwaith"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ecanw</i><par n="adw/aith__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwaith"><par n="initial-g"/><i>w</i><par n="ar/aith__n"/></e>
    <e lm="taith"><par n="initial-t"/><par n="ar/aith__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fferm"><i>fferm</i><par n="aden__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pont"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ont</i><par n="aden__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cysonyn"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yson</i><par n="ateg/yn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oedolyn"><i>oedol</i><par n="ateg/yn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cwmni"><par n="initial-c"/><i>wmn</i><par n="academ/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="polisi"><par n="initial-p"/><i>olis</i><par n="academ/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="degwm"><par n="initial-d"/><i>eg</i><par n="bot/wm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="larwm"><i>lar</i><par n="bot/wm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cywair"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yw</i><par n="allwedd/air__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rhagair"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>ag</i><par n="allwedd/air__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cwis"><par n="initial-c"/><i>wis</i><par n="ambiwlans__n"/></e>
    <e lm="niwsans"><i>niwsans</i><par n="ambiwlans__n"/></e>
    <e lm="asesydd"><i>ases</i><par n="achwyn/ydd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="etholydd"><i>ethol</i><par n="achwyn/ydd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eliffant"><i>eliffant</i><par n="baban__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ystlum"><i>ystlum</i><par n="baban__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cipolwg"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ipol</i><par n="arol/wg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rhagolwg"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>agol</i><par n="arol/wg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deiliad"><par n="initial-d"/><i>eilia</i><par n="beirnia/d__n"/></e>
    <e lm="offeiriad"><i>offeiria</i><par n="beirnia/d__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eirinen"><i>eirin</i><par n="cetris/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="teilsen"><par n="initial-t"/><i>eils</i><par n="cetris/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lluoswm"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>uos</i><par n="cyfans/wm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uchafswm"><i>uchafs</i><par n="cyfans/wm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="clipfwrdd"><par n="initial-c"/><i>lipf</i><par n="b/wrdd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="switsfwrdd"><i>switsf</i><par n="b/wrdd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwesty"><par n="initial-g"/><i>west</i><par n="deond/y__n"/></e>
    <e lm="llythrdy"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>ythrd</i><par n="deond/y__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diffynnydd"><par n="initial-d"/><i>iffyn</i><par n="cydran/nydd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dosrannydd"><par n="initial-d"/><i>osran</i><par n="cydran/nydd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="llain"><par n="initial-ll"/><i></i><par n="ats/ain__n"/></e>
    <e lm="llys-nain"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>ys-n</i><par n="ats/ain__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cnewyllyn"><par n="initial-c"/><i>newyll</i><par n="blew/yn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwybedyn"><par n="initial-g"/><i>wybed</i><par n="blew/yn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="budd-dal"><par n="initial-b"/><i>udd-dal</i><par n="anaf__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dosbarth"><par n="initial-d"/><i>osbarth</i><par n="anaf__n"/></e>
    <e lm="radiws"><i>radi</i><par n="dr/ws__n"/></e>
    <e lm="thesawrws"><par n="initial-t"/><i>hesawr</i><par n="dr/ws__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rhaglennwr"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>aglen</i><par n="annibyn/nwr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gweithredai"><par n="initial-g"/><i>weithred</i><par n="cyflog/ai__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hyfforddai"><i>hyffordd</i><par n="cyflog/ai__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cymeriadau"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ymeriad</i><par n="adolygiad/au__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apwyntiadau"><i>apwyntiad</i><par n="adolygiad/au__n"/></e>
